Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1004
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1005 to 38-1056 apply.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-343;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 266;

Laws 2016, LB898, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 4.